Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 116 Voter Registration

116.005.
Preservation by county clerk of certain voting records. [Repealed.]

116.010.
State board of elections — Membership — Appointment — Qualification — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

116.013.
“Voter” defined.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the word “voter” means any name contained in any registration list.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 1.

116.015.
Board of Election Commissioners and Board of Registration and Purgation redesignated as Board of Elections. [Repealed.]

116.020.
Secretary of board — Records — Compensation and expenses of board. [Repealed.]

116.025.
Eligibility to vote.

Every person who is a citizen of the United States, a resident of this state, and a resident of the precinct in which he or she offers to vote on or before the day preceding the closing of the registration books for any primary, general, or special election, who possesses on the day of any election the qualifications set forth in Section 145 of the Constitution, exclusive of the durational residency requirements, who is not disqualified under that section or under any other statute, and who is registered as provided in this chapter, may vote for all officers to be elected by the people and on all public questions submitted for determination at that election, in the precinct in which he or she is qualified to vote. Any person who shall have been convicted of any election law offense which is a felony shall not be permitted to vote until his or her civil rights have been restored by executive pardon.

Any person charged with or indicted for a crime, whether or not in custody for same, who has not yet been convicted of the offense and who is not otherwise ineligible to vote, may vote for all offices to be elected by the people and on all public questions submitted for determination at that election, in the precinct in which he or she is qualified to vote.

A registered voter who changes his or her place of residence from one (1) precinct to another within the same county while the registration books are closed shall be permitted to update the voting records and to vote in the present election at the appropriate precinct for the current address as set forth in KRS 116.085(3).

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any registered voter who changes his or her place of residence from one (1) precinct to another within the same county prior to the closing of the registration books and who fails to transfer his or her registration with the county clerk prior to the date the registration books are closed shall be permitted to vote in the present election at the appropriate precinct for the current address as set forth in KRS 116.085(2).

Any registered voter who changes his or her place of residence to a different county while the registration books are closed shall be permitted to vote at the appropriate precinct for his or her former residence in the present election and shall thereafter transfer his or her voter registration.

Any registered voter who changes his or her place of residence to a different county and fails to register to vote in the county of current residence prior to the date the registration books are closed shall not be eligible to vote in the present election in the county of current residence or the county of former residence.

Any registered voter who changes his or her place of registration to a different state while the registration books are closed in the new state of residence before a presidential election shall be permitted to cast an absentee ballot for President and Vice President only, notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, by mail or at the county clerk’s office of the former residence or other place designated by the county board of elections and approved by the State Board of Elections.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 2; 1982, ch. 360, § 36, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 341, § 20, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 393, § 4, effective January 1, 1995; 2002, ch. 63, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 107, § 2, effective March 30, 2006; 2022 ch. 87, § 1, effective April 7, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). In Attorney General Opinion 94-42, it was concluded that 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 393, which amended this statute “will take effect on January 1, 1995, the date the National Voter Registration Act will take effect with respect to Kentucky.”

116.030.
Meetings of board — Quorum — Chairman. [Repealed.]

116.035.
Determination of voter’s residence.

The following rules, so far as applicable, shall be observed in determining the residence of a person offering to vote:

A voter’s residence shall be deemed to be at the place where his or her habitation is, and to which, when absent, he or she has the intention of returning. For a person who is homeless and lacks an established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return, he or she may elect a location with a fixed address as a place of habitation, which shall be considered his or her residence, and may include the following:

A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accomodations; or

A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings;

A voter shall not lose his or her residence by absence for temporary purposes merely; nor shall he or she obtain a residence by being in a county or precinct for such temporary purposes, without the intention of making that county or precinct his or her home;

A voter shall lose his or her residence by removal to another state or county with intention to make his or her permanent residence there, or by removal to and residence in another state, with intention to reside there an indefinite time, or by voting there, even though he or she may have had the intention to return to this state at some future period;

The place where the family of a married person resides shall generally be considered his or her residence, unless the family so resides for a temporary purpose. If his family is permanently in one (1) place, and he or she transacts business in another, the former shall be the residence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 3; 2002, ch. 63, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2021 ch. 197, § 78, effective June 29, 2021.

116.037.
Designation of precincts in area ceded or leased to the government of the United States.

In each county having within its boundaries a geographical area which has been ceded or leased to the government of the United States, the county clerk shall designate the precincts to which voters claiming Kentucky residence for voting purposes shall be assigned. If the ceded or leased territory extends beyond a single county, the county clerk in each county encompassing a part of the territory shall assign voters to the appropriate precincts. In making the assignments of absentee voters in any county that contains all or portions of more than one (1) congressional or state legislative district, any advantage shall be given to the district containing the largest territory.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 48, § 12, effective July 13, 1990.

116.040.
County board of election commissioners — Membership — Qualification — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

116.045.
Voter registration, transfer, or change of party affiliation — Availability of forms.

Any person may register as a voter during the period registration is open if he or she possesses, or will possess on the day of the next regular election, the qualifications set forth in KRS

116.025

.

The county clerk shall cause all registration to be closed the fourth Tuesday preceding through the first Monday following any primary or general election, and the twenty-eight (28) days prior to and seven (7) days following any special election. If the last day of registration falls on a state or federal holiday, the period runs until the end of the next day which is not a Saturday or Sunday nor a state or federal holiday. During the period that registration is closed, the county clerk may accept and process registrations. Any voter who registers during the period that registration is closed, except for any registered voter who transfers his or her registration pursuant to KRS 116.085(2) or (3), shall not be permitted to vote in the upcoming election.

In all counties, the county clerk shall receive registrations, transfers, or changes of party affiliation at branch offices at any place in the county during those periods that the registration books are open except for those transfers pursuant to KRS 116.085(2) or 116.085(3). However, notice in the manner provided by KRS Chapter 424 shall be given at least three (3), but not more than fourteen (14), days in advance of the time and place of any branch registration, and ten (10) days’ written notice shall be given to the county executive committee of each major political party in the county in which the branch registration is to be held.

Any person may register to vote or may change his or her party affiliation in any of the following ways:

In person;

By mail;

By means of the federal post card application, if the person is a resident of Kentucky and a member of the Armed Forces, or a dependent of members of the Armed Forces, or overseas citizen;

By mail-in application form prescribed by the Election Assistance Commission pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993; or

By other methods of registration, or reregistration, approved by the State Board of Elections, including the use of voluntary interested groups and political parties, under the proper supervision and directions of the county clerk, which may include door to door canvassing.

Upon receipt of the form prescribed by the State Board of Elections or the Election Assistance Commission pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, properly filled out and signed by the applicant, the county clerk shall register the applicant.

Any individual or group shall have access to a reasonable number of voter registration forms including the mail-in application form prescribed by the Election Assistance Commission pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 in the county clerk’s office. The individual or group shall act under the proper supervision and directions of the county clerk and shall return these completed forms to the county clerk for official registration by the county clerk.

No later than December 31, 1994, the Transportation Cabinet shall equip all driver’s license agencies to comply with the provisions of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. The Secretary of State shall provide assistance and interpretation to the Transportation Cabinet in determining the requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993.

The county clerk shall enter the specific party identification of the voter with a political party, political organization, or political group as defined in KRS

118.015

, or independent status, as indicated by the voter on the voter registration form, into the statewide voter registration system. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to provide for tracking of the registration of voters identifying with political organizations and political groups as defined in KRS

118.015

, and voters of independent status.

For purposes of voter registration, no county clerk, governmental body of any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, charter county government, or any employee thereof, shall accept any private monetary funds to assist with voter registration activities unless accepted as part of a valid contract for goods and services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 4; 1976, ch. 30, § 1; 1980, ch. 136, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 188, § 99, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 394, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 42, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 341, § 21, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 393, § 5, effective January 1, 1995; 1996, ch. 195, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 63, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2021 ch. 197, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 23, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 23, sec. 6, provided that Act, which amended this statute, may be cited as the Stop Outside Influence Over Elections Act of 2022.

116.0452.
Standards for timely receipt of voter registration application — Removal of names from registration books — Confidentiality of registration location.

For the purpose of determining whether a voter registration application is received during the period in which registration books are open under KRS 116.045(2), an application shall be deemed timely received:

In the case of registration with a motor vehicle driver’s license application, if the valid voter registration form of the applicant is accepted by the Transportation Cabinet before the registration books are closed;

In the case of registration by mail, if the valid voter registration form of the applicant is legibly postmarked before the registration books are closed;

In the case of registration with a voter registration agency, if the valid voter registration form of the applicant is accepted at the voter registration agency before the registration books are closed; and

In any other case, if the valid voter registration form of the applicant is received by the appropriate county clerk, no later than 4 p.m. local time, before the registration books are closed.

The county clerk shall send notice to each applicant of the disposition of the application.

The name of a registered voter shall not be removed from the registration books except:

Upon request of the voter;

As provided by KRS

116.113

, upon notice of death, declaration of incompetency, or conviction of a felony; or

Upon failure to respond to a confirmation mailing sent pursuant to KRS 116.112(3) and failure to vote or appear to vote and, if necessary, correct the registration record of the voter’s address in an election during the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the date of the second general election for Federal office that occurs after the date of the notice.

The identity of the voter registration agency or Transportation Cabinet office through which any particular voter is registered shall not be disclosed to the public.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 393, § 3, effective January 1, 1995; 1996, ch. 195, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 63, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2016 ch. 62, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; 2020 ch. 51, § 34, effective March 27, 2020.

116.0455.
Voter registration through motor vehicle driver’s license application.

Each motor vehicle driver’s license application, including any renewal application, submitted to the appropriate motor vehicle authority shall serve as an application for voter registration unless the applicant fails to sign the voter registration application.

An application for voter registration submitted under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be considered as updating any previous voter registration by the applicant.

No information relating to the failure of an applicant for a motor vehicle driver’s license to sign a voter registration application may be used for any purpose other than voter registration.

The Transportation Cabinet shall include a voter registration application form as part of an application for a motor vehicle driver’s license.

The voter registration application portion of an application for a motor vehicle driver’s license shall comply with the requirements of Section 5 of Public Law 103-31, the National Voter Registration Act of 1993.

Any change of address form submitted for purposes of a motor vehicle driver’s license shall serve as notification of change of address for voter registration for the registrant involved unless the registrant states on the form that the change of address is not for voter registration purposes.

A completed voter registration portion of an application for a motor vehicle driver’s license accepted by the Transportation Cabinet shall be transmitted to the county clerk of the county of the applicant’s voting residence not later than ten (10) days after the date of acceptance.

If a voter registration application is accepted within five (5) days before the last day for registration to vote in an election, the application shall be transmitted to the county clerk of the county of the applicant’s voting residence not later than five (5) days after the date of acceptance.

The Transportation Cabinet shall provide to the county clerk a declination statement signed by an applicant if the applicant has declined to register to vote.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 393, § 1, effective January 1, 1995; 2002, ch. 63, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2020 ch. 51, § 35, effective March 27, 2020.

116.046.
Voter registration forms for public high schools, area technology centers, and private schools — Public education program.

The county clerk shall provide voter registration forms annually to each principal or assistant principal of every public high school, each area technology center, and private schools, and each school shall have a designated person who shall be responsible for informing students and school personnel of the availability of the registration forms and assist them in properly registering. The completed forms shall be returned to the county clerk, for official registration by the county clerk.

Any person designated to assist in registration in subsection (1) of this section shall fulfill this responsibility in an impartial and fair manner and shall not recruit a registrant for any particular party.

The State Board of Education shall implement annual programs of public education regarding elections, voting procedures, and election fraud, which shall include an audio-visual presentation for high school juniors and seniors. The State Board of Education, after consultation with the State Board of Elections, shall update the public education programs required by this section as relevant statutory changes occur, as different types of voting systems are used, or as more effective methods of presentation shall be developed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, §§ 5, 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 2021 ch. 197, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

116.047.
Forgery, alteration, destruction or failure to return completed registration form.

Any individual who forges or fraudulently alters a form completed by the prospective registrant, who willfully destroys a completed registration form or who willfully fails to return a completed form to the county clerk for official registration by the county clerk shall be subject to the penalties described for Class D felonies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 30, § 2.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Class D felony, term of imprisonment, KRS

532.060

.

Class D felony, fines, KRS

534.030

.

116.048.
Voter registration agencies.

The following agencies are designated as voter registration agencies in accordance with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993:

Agencies that provide benefits under public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act, the Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children, the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program, or the Food Stamps Program;

Armed Forces recruitment offices;

Other agencies as the Secretary of State shall determine to be providing public assistance; and

Other agencies as the Secretary of State shall determine to be state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities.

A voter registration agency that provides service or assistance in conducting voter registration shall:

Distribute with each application for its service or assistance, and with each recertification, renewal, or change of address form, the office’s own voter registration application form that complies with the requirements of Section 7 of Public Law 103-31, the National Voter Registration Act of 1993;

Provide a form that includes:

The question, “If you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here today?”;

If the agency provides public assistance, the statement, “Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency.”;

Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant would like to register or declines to register to vote (failure to check either box being deemed to constitute a declination to register for purposes of paragraph (c) of this subsection), together with the statement in close proximity to the boxes and in prominent type, “IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX, YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.”;

The statement, “If you would like help in filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill out the application form in private.”; and

The statement, “If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to vote, your right to privacy in deciding whether to register or in applying to register to vote, or your right to choose your own political party or other political preference, you may file a complaint with _________ .”, the blank being filled by the name, address, and telephone number of the appropriate official to whom a complaint should be addressed; and

Provide to each applicant who does not decline to register to vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the registration application form as is provided by the office with regard to the completion of its own forms, unless the applicant refuses assistance.

At each voter registration agency, the following services shall be made available:

Distribution of mail voter registration forms;

Assistance to applicants in completing voter registration application forms, unless the applicant refuses assistance; and

Acceptance of completed voter registration application forms for transmittal to the county clerk of the county of the applicant’s voting residence.

If a voter registration agency designated under subsection (1)(d) of this section provides services to a person with a disability at the person’s home, the agency shall provide the services described in paragraph (a) of this subsection at the person’s home.

A person who provides services described in subsection (3) of this section shall not:

Seek to influence an applicant’s political preference or party registration;

Display any material indicating the person’s political preference or party allegiance;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering to vote; or

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register or not to register to vote has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.

The State Board of Elections may designate requirements for record keeping and document retention it deems necessary to comply with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 and the provisions of this chapter.

A completed registration application accepted at a voter registration agency shall be transmitted to the county clerk of the county of the applicant’s voting residence or the State Board of Elections not later than ten (10) days after the date of acceptance.

If a registration application is accepted within five (5) days before the last day for registration to vote in an election, the application shall be transmitted to the county clerk of the county of the applicant’s voting residence or the State Board of Elections not later than five (5) days after the date of acceptance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 393, § 2, effective January 1, 1995; 1998, ch. 100, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). In Attorney General Opinion 94-42, it was concluded that 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 393, which enacted this statute “will take effect on January 1, 1995, the date the National Voter Registration Act will take effect with respect to Kentucky.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

Acts 1994, Ch. 393, legislation enacting the requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 will take effect on January 1, 1995, the date the National Voter Registration Act will take effect with respect to Kentucky.

OAG 94-42

.

116.049.
Voter registration card. [Repealed.]

116.050.
Secretary of county board — Records — Quorum — Chairman — Notice of meetings. [Repealed.]

116.055.
Qualifications for voting in a primary.

Before a person shall be qualified to vote in a primary, he or she:

Shall possess all the qualifications required of voters in a regular election;

Shall have been a registered member of the party in whose primary he or she seeks to vote on December 31 immediately preceding the primary; and

Shall have remained continuously registered as a member of that party in whose primary he or she seeks to vote between December 31 immediately preceding the primary and the date set for the primary.

In the case of a new registration made after December 31 immediately preceding the primary, a voter shall have registered and remained continuously registered as a member of the party in whose primary he or she seeks to vote from the date of registration until the date set for the primary.

Any voter who withdraws his or her registration after December 31 immediately preceding the primary, and reregisters as a voter with a different party affiliation, during those periods that the registration books are open immediately preceding the primary, shall not be eligible to vote in the upcoming primary.

No person shall be allowed to vote for any party candidates or slates of candidates other than that of the party of which he or she is a registered member.

The qualifications shall be determined as of the date of the primary, without regard to the qualifications or disqualifications as they may exist at the succeeding regular election, except that minors seventeen (17) years of age who will become eighteen (18) years of age on or before the day of the regular election shall be entitled to vote in the primary if otherwise qualified. However, any registered voter, whether registered as a member of a party, political organization, political group, or as an independent, shall be qualified to vote in a primary for candidates listed in all nonpartisan races.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 5; 1976, ch. 54, § 20, effective March 10, 1976; 1988, ch. 341, § 22, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 288, § 34, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 243, § 1, effective April 1, 1998; 2008, ch. 129, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 112, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

116.060.
Compensation of county election commissioners. [Repealed.]

116.065.
Verification of applications.

Each application for registration, change of affiliation, transfer of registration, federal provisional ballot, absentee ballot, or federal provisional absentee ballot, as absentee ballots and federal provisional absentee ballots are provided for by
KRS

117.076

,

117.077

,

117.085

, and

117.229

shall be verified by a written declaration by the applicant that it is made under the penalties of perjury.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 6; 1982, ch. 360, § 37, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 296, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2019 ch. 112, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 89, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 87, § 2, effective April 7, 2022.

116.070.
Regular election officers — Appointment — Term. [Repealed.]

116.075.
Registration application form — Report to state board. [Repealed.]

116.080.
Qualifications of regular election officers — Removals — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

116.085.
Transfer of registration — Change of residence — Name change.

When a voter changes his place of residence to another location within the county, the clerk shall, upon application of the voter in person, by mail, or through the Transportation Cabinet, transfer the voter’s registration record to the proper precinct.

When a registered voter changes his place of residence from one (1) precinct to another within the same county before the registration books are closed and fails to transfer his registration with the county clerk prior to the date the registration books are closed, the voter shall be permitted to update the voting records and to vote in the present election at the appropriate precinct for the current address upon affirmation of his current address and signing the precinct list as set forth in KRS

117.225

. Before being permitted to vote, the voter shall also confirm his identity as required in KRS

117.227

and complete the affidavit which is required to be completed by a voter whose right to vote has been challenged. The subscribed oaths shall be delivered to the county clerk and investigated in accordance with KRS

117.245

.

When a registered voter changes his place of residence from one (1) precinct to another precinct within the same county after the registration books close, the voter shall be permitted to vote in the present election at the appropriate precinct for the current address upon affirmation of his current address and signing the precinct list as set forth in KRS

117.225

. Before being permitted to vote, the voter shall confirm his identity as required by KRS

117.227

and complete the affidavit which is required to be completed by a voter whose right to vote is challenged. The subscribed oaths shall be delivered to the county clerk and investigated in accordance with KRS

117.245

.

When the boundaries of a precinct are changed by law, placing a registered voter in a new or different precinct, the clerk shall automatically transfer the voter’s registration record to the proper precinct and mail the voter a notice of the change.

A voter who has changed his name may indicate the change at the precinct on election day by completing the form provided for this purpose by the State Board of Elections. The form shall be returned by the precinct officer to the county clerk who shall make the necessary change on the voter’s registration record.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 8; 1990, ch. 48, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 393, § 6, effective January 1, 1995; 2020 ch. 51, § 36, effective March 27, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). In Attorney General Opinion 94-42, it was concluded that 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 393, which amended this statute “will take effect on January 1, 1995, the date the National Voter Registration Act will take effect with respect to Kentucky.”

116.090.
Primary election officers — Appointment of. [Repealed.]

116.095.
Access to registration records — Redaction of Social Security numbers.

The county clerk shall permit any citizen, at all reasonable hours, to inspect or make copies of any registration record, without any fee. He or she shall, upon request, furnish to any citizen a copy of the registration records, for which he or she may charge necessary duplicating costs not to exceed fifty cents ($0.50) per page. If a registered voter’s Social Security number is included on his or her registration information, the Social Security number shall be redacted by the county clerk before it is duplicated and furnished to the citizen requesting the copy and before it is inspected or duplicated by the citizen.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 9; 1990, ch. 48, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 2016 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The restrictions contained in subsection (3) (i) of KRS

117.025

in no way affect or restrict the provisions of this section.

OAG 75-174

.

This section clearly requires the clerk to permit any citizen to inspect or make copies of individual registration records on file in the clerk’s office or be furnished copies of such records for a fee, which will, of course, include the worker’s social security number and signature contained thereon as required by KRS

116.155

.

OAG 75-174

.

The County Clerk’s reliance on KRS 61.878(1)(a) as the basis for denying access to the voter assistance forms identified in the request was, with the exception of the protection it extends to social security numbers appearing on those forms, misplaced. The County Clerk should copy the voter assistance forms to which the requester requested access and permit him to inspect those copies after redacting the social security numbers appearing thereon. OAG 03-ORD-34.

116.100.
Enforcement of provisions as to appointment of primary election officers. [Repealed.]

116.105.
County clerk’s fees. [Repealed.]

116.110.
Bona fide candidate defined — Bona fides questioned. [Repealed.]

116.112.
Voter registration purge program — Inactive voter list.

The State Board of Elections shall establish a voter registration purge program using the change-of-address information supplied by the United States Postal Service through its licensees or other sources to identify voters whose addresses may have changed.

If it appears from information provided by the postal service or other sources that a voter has moved to a different address in the same county in which the voter is currently registered, the State Board of Elections shall provide to the county board of elections the information necessary to change the registration records to show the new address and the State Board of Elections shall send to the new address a notice of the change by forwardable mail on a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections and a postage prepaid, pre-addressed return form by which the voter may verify or correct the address information.

If the county board of elections requests authorization from the State Board of Elections to send address confirmation notices as provided in this subsection, the State Board of Elections shall grant the request.

If it appears from information provided by the postal service or other sources that a voter has moved to a different address not in the same county, the State Board of Elections shall send to the address from which the voter was last registered, by forwardable mail, a notice on a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections, with a postage prepaid and pre-addressed return card on which the voter may state his current address.

If a county board of elections requests authorization from the state board to send address confirmation notices as provided in this subsection, the state board shall grant the request.

The state or county boards of elections shall not remove the name of a voter from the registration records on the ground that the voter has changed his residence unless the voter:

Confirms in writing that the voter has changed residence to a place outside the county; or

Has failed to respond to the notice described in subsection (3) of this section; and

Has not voted or appeared to vote and, if necessary, correct the registration records of the voter’s address in an election during the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the date of the second general election for Federal office that occurs after the date of the notice.

If a county board of elections requests authorization from the state board to conduct purges of voters in its county in accordance with the provisions of this subsection, the state board shall grant the request.

The State Board of Elections shall establish an inactive list of all voters who fail to respond to the notice described in subsection (3) of this section and do not vote or appear to vote in an election during the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the date of the second general election for federal office that occurs after the date of the notice. If a county board of elections requests authorization from the state board to establish an inactive list of voters for its county, the state board shall grant the request.

The State Board of Elections shall complete, not later than ninety (90) days prior to the date of a primary or regular election, any program the purpose of which is to systematically remove the names of ineligible voters from the registration records.

Voters placed on an inactive list are to be counted only for purposes of voting and not for purposes of establishing or modifying precincts, calculating the amount of reimbursement of county clerks by the State Board of Elections for certain election-related expenses, or reporting official statistics, except as provided by the Election Assistance Commission’s regulations promulgated pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993.

The State Board of Elections and county boards of elections shall maintain for at least two (2) years and shall make available for public inspection and, where available, photocopying at a reasonable cost, all records concerning the implementation of programs and activities conducted for the purpose of ensuring the accuracy and currency of the registration records, except to the extent that the records relate to the declination to register to vote or the identity of a voter registration agency through which any particular voter is registered.

The records maintained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall include lists of the names and addresses of all persons to whom notices described in subsection (3) are sent, and information concerning whether each person has responded to the notice as of the date that inspection of the records is made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 7, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 393, § 7, effective January 1, 1995; 1996, ch. 195, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 63, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2021 ch. 197, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). In Attorney General Opinion 94-42, it was concluded that 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 393, which amended this statute “will take effect on January 1, 1995, the date the National Voter Registration Act will take effect with respect to Kentucky.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

Acts 1994, Ch. 393, legislation enacting the requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 will take effect on January 1, 1995, the date the National Voter Registration Act will take effect with respect to Kentucky.

OAG 94-42

.